Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.20
Franchisee, defined.

Franchisee means
a new motor vehicle dealer who receives motor vehicles from the franchisor
under a franchise and who offers and sells such motor vehicles to the general
public.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 32.